Utah statutes.
67-20-7.   Workers' compensation benefits for a volunteer safety officer.
(1) A volunteer safety officer is considered an employee of an agency that
supervises the volunteer safety officer for the purpose of receiving workers'
compensation benefits under:
(a)  Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act; and
(b)  Title 34A, Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.
(2) (a)  In accordance with Section 34A-2-105, the workers' compensation
benefits described in Subsection (1) are the exclusive remedy against the
supervising agency, or an officer, agent, or employee of the supervising
agency, for all injuries and occupational diseases resulting from the
volunteer safety officer's services for the supervising agency as a volunteer
safety officer.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), the supervising agency for whom the
volunteer safety officer provides services as a volunteer safety officer is
considered an employer of the volunteer safety officer.
(3)  To compute the workers' compensation benefits for a volunteer safety
officer described in Subsection (1), the average weekly wage of the volunteer
safety officer shall be the state's average weekly wage at the time of the
industrial accident or occupational disease that is the basis for the
volunteer safety officer's worker's compensation claim.
